Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 18A State Personnel
18A.110.
Personnel secretary — Regulatory authority — Resolution of conflicting provisions of law. [Effective April 1, 2023]

The secretary shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the classified service governing:

Applications and examinations;

Certification and selection of eligibles;

Classification and compensation plans;

Incentive programs;

Lay-offs;

Registers;

Types of appointments;

Attendance; hours of work; compensatory time; annual, court, military, sick, voting, living organ donor, and special leaves of absence, provided that the secretary shall not promulgate administrative regulations that would reduce the rate at which employees may accumulate leave time below the rate effective on December 10, 1985; and

Employee evaluations.

The secretary shall promulgate comprehensive administrative regulations for the unclassified service.

Except as provided by KRS

18A.355

, the secretary shall not promulgate administrative regulations that would reduce an employee’s salary; and

As provided by KRS 18A.0751(4)(e), the secretary may submit a proposed administrative regulation providing for an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months to the board for its approval.

The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations to implement state government’s affirmative action plan under KRS

18A.138

.

The administrative regulations shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, and shall have the force and effect of law after compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 13A and 18A and the procedures adopted thereunder;

Administrative regulations promulgated by the secretary shall not expand or restrict rights granted to, or duties imposed upon, employees and administrative bodies by the provisions of this chapter; and

No administrative body other than the Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations governing the subject matters specified in this section.

Prior to filing an administrative regulation with the Legislative Research Commission, the secretary shall submit the administrative regulation to the board for review.

The board shall review the administrative regulation proposed by the secretary not less than twenty (20) days after its submission to it;

Not less than five (5) days after its review, the board shall submit its recommendations in writing to the secretary;

The secretary shall review the recommendations of the board and may revise the proposed administrative regulation if he deems it necessary; and

After the secretary has completed the review provided for in this section, he may file the proposed administrative regulation with the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

The administrative regulations shall provide:

For the preparation, maintenance, and revision of a position classification plan for all positions in the classified service, based upon similarity of duties performed and responsibilities assumed, so that the same qualifications may reasonably be required for, and the same schedule of pay may be equitably applied to, all positions in the same class. The secretary shall allocate the position of every employee in the classified service to one (1) of the classes in the plan. The secretary shall reallocate existing positions, after consultation with appointing authorities, when it is determined that they are incorrectly allocated, and there has been no substantial change in duties from those in effect when such positions were last classified. The occupant of a position being reallocated shall continue to serve in the reallocated position with no reduction in salary;

For a pay plan for all employees in the classified service, after consultation with appointing authorities and the state budget director. The plan shall take into account such factors as:

The relative levels of duties and responsibilities of various classes of positions;

Rates paid for comparable positions elsewhere taking into consideration the effect of seniority on such rates; and

The state’s financial resources.

Amendments to the pay plan shall be made in the same manner. Each employee shall be paid at one (1) of the rates set forth in the pay plan for the class of position in which he is employed, provided that the full amount of the annual increment provided for by the provisions of KRS

18A.355

, and the full amount of an increment due to a promotion, salary adjustment, reclassification, or reallocation, shall be added to an employee’s base salary or wages;

For open competitive examinations to test the relative fitness of applicants for the respective positions. The examinations shall be announced publicly and applications accepted at least ten (10) days prior to certification of a register, and may be advertised through the press, radio, and other media. The secretary shall continue to receive applications and examine candidates on a continuous basis long enough to assure a sufficient number of eligibles to meet the needs of the service. Except as provided by this chapter, he shall add the names of successful candidates to existing eligible lists in accordance with their respective ratings. The secretary shall be free to use any investigation of education and experience and any test of capacity, knowledge, manual skill, character, personal traits, or physical fitness, which in his judgment, serves the need to discover the relative fitness of applicants;

As provided by this chapter, for the establishment of eligible lists for appointment, upon which lists shall be placed the names of successful candidates in the order of their relative excellence in the respective examinations. Except as provided by this chapter, an eligible’s score shall expire automatically one (1) year from the date of testing, unless the life of the score is extended by action of the secretary for a period not to exceed one (1) additional year. Except for those individuals exercising reemployment rights, all eligibles may be removed from the register when a new examination is established;

For the rejection of candidates or eligibles who fail to comply with reasonable requirements of the secretary in regard to such factors as age, physical condition, training, and experience, or who have attempted any deception or fraud in connection with an examination;

Except as provided by this chapter, for the appointment of a person whose score is included in the five (5) highest scores earned on the examination;

For annual, sick, and special leaves of absence, with or without pay, or reduced pay, after approval by the Governor as provided by KRS 18A.155(1)(d);

For lay-offs, in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.113

,

18A.1131

, and

18A.1132

, by reasons of lack of work, abolishment of a position, a material change in duties or organization, or a lack of funds;

For the development and operation of programs to improve the work effectiveness of employees in the state service, including training, whether in-service or compensated educational leave, safety, health, welfare, counseling, recreation, employee relations, and employee mobility without written examination;

For a uniform system of annual employee evaluation for classified employees, with status, that shall be considered in determining eligibility for discretionary salary advancements, promotions, and disciplinary actions. The administrative regulations shall:

Require the secretary to determine the appropriate number of job categories to be evaluated and a method for rating each category;

Provide for periodic informal reviews during the evaluation period which shall be documented on the evaluation form and pertinent comments by either the employee or supervisor may be included;

Establish a procedure for internal dispute resolution with respect to the final evaluation rating;

Permit a classified employee, with status, who receives either of the two (2) lowest possible evaluation ratings to appeal to the Personnel Board for review after exhausting the internal dispute resolution procedure. The final evaluation shall not include supervisor comments on ratings other than the lowest two (2) ratings;

Require that an employee who receives the highest possible rating shall receive the equivalent of two (2) workdays, not to exceed sixteen (16) hours, credited to his or her annual leave balance. An employee who receives the second highest possible rating shall receive the equivalent of one (1) workday, not to exceed eight (8) hours, credited to his or her annual leave balance; and

Require that an employee who receives the lowest possible evaluation rating shall either be demoted to a position commensurate with the employee’s skills and abilities or be terminated; and

For other administrative regulations not inconsistent with this chapter and KRS Chapter 13A, as may be proper and necessary for its enforcement.

For any individual hired or elected to office before January 1, 2015, and paid through the Kentucky Human Resources Information System, the Personnel Cabinet shall not require payroll payments to be made by direct deposit or require the individual to use a Web-based program to access his or her salary statement.

To the extent that KRS

16.010

to

16.199

,

16.080

, and

16.584

and administrative regulations promulgated by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police under authority granted in KRS Chapter 16 conflict with this section or any administrative regulation promulgated by the secretary pursuant to authority granted in this section, the provisions of KRS Chapter 16 shall prevail.

HISTORY:

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 22, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 494, § 17, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 203, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 414, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 309, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 486, § 35, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 25, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 487, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 540, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 501, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2015 ch. 25, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 110, § 11, effective July 15, 2016; 2016 ch. 109, § 10, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 107, § 3, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 181, § 7, effective April 1, 2023.

18A.111.
Probationary periods for classified service — Initial and promotional.

Except when appointed to a job classification with an initial probationary period in excess of six (6) months, and except as provided in KRS

18A.005

and this section, an employee shall serve a six (6) months probationary period when he is initially appointed to the classified service. An employee may be separated from his position, reduced in class or rank, or replaced on the eligible list during this initial probationary period and shall not have a right to appeal, except as provided by KRS

18A.095

. The employee may be placed on an eligible list but shall not be certified to the agency from which he was separated unless that agency so requests. Unless the appointing authority notifies the employee prior to the end of the initial probationary period that he is separated, the employee shall be deemed to have served satisfactorily and shall acquire status in the classified service.

An employee who satisfactorily completes the initial probationary period for the position to which he was initially appointed to the classified service shall be granted status and may not be demoted, disciplined, dismissed, or otherwise penalized, except as provided by the provisions of this chapter.

An employee ordered reinstated by the board shall not be required to serve a probationary period unless the board rules otherwise.

An employee with status, who has been promoted, shall serve a promotional probationary period of six (6) months, except for those employees granted leave in excess of twenty (20) consecutive work days during this period. Such probationary periods shall be extended as prescribed in KRS

18A.005

. During this period, he shall retain the rights and privileges granted by the provisions of this chapter to status employees.

An employee with status may request that he be reverted to a position in his former class at any time during the promotional probationary period.

A laid-off employee who accepts a bona fide written offer of appointment to a position shall not be required to serve an initial probationary period. He shall be an employee with status and shall have all rights and privileges granted employees with status under the provisions of this chapter.

A former unclassified employee under KRS 18A.115(1)(d), (e), (f), (g), (h), or (i) shall serve an initial probationary period of twelve (12) months if the employee is appointed to a position in the classified service, unless that employee had previously had status in the classified service or had been separated from his or her previous unclassified position for at least one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the effective date of his or her appointment to the classified service.

Notification to an employee on initial or promotional probation of the reason the probationary employment has been terminated by the appointing authority shall not confer a right to appeal to the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 494, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 203, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 154, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 122, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 153, § 9, effective April 13, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.112.
Performance evaluations. [Repealed.]

18A.113.
Lay-off rules — General.

It shall be unlawful to coerce employees who may be or who are subject to lay-off to resign or retire in lieu of lay-off. Dismissals shall comply with statutes relating thereto, and lay-offs shall not be utilized as a method of dismissal.

In the same cabinet, county, and job classification, federally funded time-limited, interim, and probationary employees shall be laid-off before full-time or part-time employees with status. For purposes of lay-off, “probationary employee” does not include an employee with status serving a promotional probation. A cabinet shall not transfer positions, including vacant positions, in order to circumvent the provisions of this section.

If two (2) or more employees subject to lay-off in a lay-off plan submitted to the secretary have the same qualifications, the employee with the lesser seniority shall be laid-off first.

An employee who is laid-off shall be placed on a reemployment register for the class of position from which he was laid-off and for any class for which he is qualified. He shall have the right to test for any class of position for which he is qualified to take an examination. If he passes the examination, he shall be placed on the register for the class.

For a period of five (5) years, laid-off employees shall be hired before any applicant or eligible except another laid-off employee with greater seniority who is already on such register.

For a period of five (5) years, a laid-off employee shall not be removed from any register unless:

He notifies the cabinet in writing that he no longer desires consideration for a position on such register;

He declines two (2) written offers of appointment to a position of the same classification and salary, and located in the same county, as the position from which he was laid-off;

Without good cause, he fails to report for an interview after he has been notified in writing at least ten (10) calendar days prior to the date of the interview;

He is unqualified for appointment;

He is unable to perform the duties of the class;

He has made a false statement of a material fact in his application;

He has used or attempted to use political influence or bribery to secure an advantage in connection with his placement on the register;

He has been convicted of a felony within the preceding five (5) years and his civil rights have not been restored or he has not been pardoned by the Governor;

He has been convicted of a job related misdemeanor, except that convictions for violations of traffic regulations shall not constitute grounds for disqualification;

He cannot be located by postal authorities at the last address provided by him; or

He has otherwise willfully violated the provisions of this chapter.

When the cabinet is notified by an appointing authority that a laid-off employee has accepted a bona fide offer of appointment to any position, effective on a specified date, his name may be removed from the register for all classes for which the maximum salary is the same as or less than that of the class to which he has been appointed.

When a laid-off employee is removed from a register he shall be notified in writing and shall be notified of his right to appeal to the board under the provisions of KRS

18A.095

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 494, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 154, § 28, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 540, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 127, § 2, effective July 13, 2004.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.1131.
Lay-off rules applicable to classified employees only.

A lay-off of a state employee with status in the executive branch due to the abolition of a position, lack of work, or a material change in duties or organization shall comply with the provisions of this section.

Prior to the notification of an employee that he is subject to lay-off and prior to the lay-off of an employee, the appointing authority shall submit a lay-off plan to the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet for approval. Such plan shall contain the name of the employee and the reasons, in detail, for such lay-off. Upon approval of the plan by the secretary, the employee shall be notified that he is subject to lay-off and of:

The reason for the lay-off;

The procedures established by the provisions of KRS

18A.113

and this section for the lay-off of employees; and

The rights granted employees subject to lay-off and to laid-off employees.

An employee subject to lay-off shall be transferred to a vacant position of the same pay grade, level of duties, and responsibilities for which he is qualified within the cabinet. Such position shall be located in the same county as the position from which the employee is subject to lay-off;

If such a vacancy does not exist, the employee shall be transferred to a vacant position within the cabinet for which he is qualified. Such position shall be located in the same county as the position from which the employee is subject to lay-off; and

If such a position is not available, the employee shall be notified of all vacant positions within the cabinet for which he is qualified to take an examination. The employee shall have the right to take an examination for any vacant position within the cabinet for which he is qualified. If he passes the examination, he shall be appointed to that position before any applicant or eligible on a register, except another laid-off employee with greater seniority already on such register.

If no position is available to an employee subject to lay-off under the procedure established by subsection (3) of this section, the appointing authority shall notify the employee and the Personnel Cabinet; and

The Personnel Cabinet shall coordinate efforts to transfer an employee subject to lay-off to another agency. It shall have the authority to transfer an employee subject to lay-off under this section, with the approval of the appointing authority of the agency to which the employee is to be transferred.

If no position is available, the employee shall have the right to take an examination for any position for which he is qualified. If he passes the examination, he shall be hired before any applicant or eligible on a register, except a laid-off employee with greater seniority already on such register.

If no position is available to an employee subject to layoff under the procedure established by subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the employee shall be notified in writing that he is to be laid off effective fifteen (15) days after receipt of notice, and of the rights and privileges granted laid-off employees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 494, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 154, § 29, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 487, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 154 and 487. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 487, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.1132.
Lay-off rules applicable to both classified and unclassified employees.

Prior to a lay-off of state employees in the executive branch required by a budget reduction plan enacted pursuant to KRS

48.130

, each cabinet shall prepare a lay-off plan that complies with the provisions of KRS

18A.113

and this section.

Each lay-off plan shall provide that a lay-off of state employees shall occur only after all other cost saving measures are taken and have failed to alleviate the revenue shortfall, as defined in KRS

48.010

, of five percent (5%) or less. These measures shall be specified in the plan, in detail, and shall include but not be limited to:

A hiring freeze of all types of appointments;

A reduction or delay of expenditures that would not prevent the provision of services required by law;

Consolidation of offices and job duties that would not prevent the provision of services required by law;

Transfer of funds as provided by the budget reduction plan enacted pursuant to KRS Chapter 48;

Transfer of funds appropriated for or allotted to vacant positions as provided by the budget reduction plan provided for by KRS

48.130

, unless it is certified that the positions are essential and cannot be filled in the period during which lay-offs are to occur by transfer of existing employees of the appointing authority;

The filling of vacancies and promotions from within the cabinet; and

Transfers of employees within the cabinet as provided by KRS 18A.1131(3) and (4).

Each cabinet shall submit:

Its lay-off plan; and

A list of employees who would remain subject to lay-off after the implementation of cost-saving measures;

to the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet for review. Upon approval, the lay-off plans shall be submitted to the Governor for approval.

Upon approval of the plan by the Governor, the secretary shall attempt to transfer employees as provided by KRS 18A.1131(4)(b). Employees who cannot be so transferred may be laid-off.

If no position is available to an employee subject to lay-off under the procedures established by this section, the employee shall be notified in writing that he is to be laid-off effective fifteen (15) days after receipt of notice and of the rights and privileges granted laid-off employees.

When the hiring freeze is ended, laid-off employees shall be hired before any applicant or eligible except laid-off employees already on such registers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 494, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 387, § 30, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 30, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 487, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 25, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 154 and 487. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 487, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, C, 2, (1) at 1658.

18A.115.
Employment exempted from classified service — Reversion rights of career employees promoted outside classified service — Transfer of employees to Kentucky Community and Technical College System — Change of personnel system for employees of Department for Technical Education and Department for Adult Education and Literacy — Change of personnel system for some employees of Eastern Kentucky University.

The classified service to which KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

shall apply shall comprise all positions in the state service now existing or hereafter established, except the following:

The General Assembly and employees of the General Assembly, including the employees of the Legislative Research Commission;

Officers elected by popular vote and persons appointed to fill vacancies in elective offices;

Members of boards and commissions;

Officers and employees on the staff of the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Office of the Secretary of the Governor’s Cabinet, and the Office of Program Administration;

Cabinet secretaries, commissioners, office heads, and the administrative heads of all boards and commissions, including the executive director of Kentucky Educational Television;

Employees of Kentucky Educational Television who have been determined to be exempt from classified service by the Kentucky Authority for Educational Television, which shall have sole authority over such exempt employees for employment, dismissal, and setting of compensation, up to the maximum established for the executive director and his principal assistants;

One (1) principal assistant or deputy for each person exempted under subsection (1)(e) of this section;

One (1) additional principal assistant or deputy as may be necessary for making and carrying out policy for each person exempted under subsection (1)(e) of this section in those instances in which the nature of the functions, size, or complexity of the unit involved are such that the secretary approves such an addition on petition of the relevant cabinet secretary or department head and such other principal assistants, deputies, or other major assistants as may be necessary for making and carrying out policy for each person exempted under subsection (1)(e) of this section in those instances in which the nature of the functions, size, or complexity of the unit involved are such that the board may approve such an addition or additions on petition of the department head approved by the secretary. Effective August 1, 2010:

All positions approved under this paragraph prior to August 1, 2010, shall be abolished effective December 31, 2010, unless reapproved under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; and

A position approved under this paragraph on or after August 1, 2010, shall be approved for a period of five (5) years, after which time the position shall be abolished unless reapproved under this subparagraph for an additional five (5) year period;

Division directors subject to the provisions of KRS

18A.170

. Division directors in the classified service as of January 1, 1980, shall remain in the classified service;

Physicians employed as such;

One (1) private secretary for each person exempted under subsection (1)(e), (g), and (h) of this section;

The judicial department, referees, receivers, jurors, and notaries public;

Officers and members of the staffs of state universities and colleges and student employees of such institutions; officers and employees of the Teachers’ Retirement System; and officers, teachers, and employees of local boards of education;

Patients or inmates employed in state institutions;

Persons employed in a professional or scientific capacity to make or conduct a temporary or special inquiry, investigation, or examination on behalf of the General Assembly, or a committee thereof, or by authority of the Governor, and persons employed by state agencies for a specified, limited period to provide professional, technical, scientific, or artistic services under the provisions of KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

;

Interim employees;

Officers and members of the state militia;

Department of Kentucky State Police troopers;

University or college engineering students or other students employed part-time or part-year by the state through special personnel recruitment programs; provided that while so employed such aides shall be under contract to work full-time for the state after graduation for a period of time approved by the commissioner or shall be participants in a cooperative education program approved by the commissioner;

Superintendents of state mental institutions, including heads of centers for individuals with an intellectual disability, and penal and correctional institutions as referred to in KRS 196.180(2);

Staff members of the Kentucky Historical Society, if they are hired in accordance with KRS

171.311

;

County and Commonwealth’s attorneys and their respective appointees;

Chief district engineers and the state highway engineer;

Veterinarians employed as such by the Kentucky Horse Racing Commission;

Employees of the Kentucky Peace Corps;

Employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education;

Executive director of the Commonwealth Office of Technology;

Employees of Serve Kentucky;

Persons employed in certified teaching positions at the Kentucky School for the Blind and the Kentucky School for the Deaf;

Federally funded time-limited employees as defined in KRS

18A.005

; and

Employees of the Department of Agriculture who are employed to support the Agricultural Development Board and the Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.

Nothing in KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

is intended, or shall be construed, to alter or amend the provisions of KRS

150.022

and

150.061

.

Nothing in KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

is intended or shall be construed to affect any nonmanagement, nonpolicy-making position which must be included in the classified service as a prerequisite to the grant of federal funds to a state agency.

Career employees within the classified service promoted to positions exempted from classified service shall, upon termination of their employment in the exempted service, revert to a position in that class in the agency from which they were terminated if a vacancy in that class exists. If no such vacancy exists, they shall be considered for employment in any vacant position for which they were qualified pursuant to KRS

18A.130

and

18A.135

.

Nothing in KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

shall be construed as precluding appointing officers from filling unclassified positions in the manner in which positions in the classified service are filled except as otherwise provided in KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

.

The positions of employees who are transferred, effective July 1, 1998, from the Cabinet for Workforce Development to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall be abolished and the employees’ names removed from the roster of state employees. Employees that are transferred, effective July 1, 1998, to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System under KRS Chapter 164shall have the same benefits and rights as they had under KRS Chapter 18A and have under KRS

164.5805

; however, they shall have no guaranteed reemployment rights in the KRS Chapter 151B or KRS Chapter 18A personnel systems. An employee who seeks reemployment in a state position under KRS Chapter 151B or KRS Chapter 18A shall have years of service in the Kentucky Community and Technical College System counted towards years of experience for calculating benefits and compensation.

On August 15, 2000, all certified and equivalent personnel, all unclassified personnel, and all certified and equivalent and unclassified vacant positions in the Department for Adult Education and Literacy shall be transferred from the personnel system under KRS Chapter 151B to the personnel system under KRS Chapter 18A. The positions shall be deleted from the KRS Chapter 151B personnel system. All records shall be transferred including accumulated annual leave, sick leave, compensatory time, and service credit for each affected employee. The personnel officers who administer the personnel systems under KRS Chapter 151B and KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary administrative procedures to effect the change in personnel authority. No certified or equivalent employee in the Department for Adult Education and Literacy shall suffer any penalty in the transfer.

On August 15, 2000, secretaries and assistants attached to policymaking positions in the Department for Technical Education and the Department for Adult Education and Literacy shall be transferred from the personnel system under KRS Chapter 151B to the personnel system under KRS Chapter 18A. The positions shall be deleted from the KRS Chapter 151B system. All records shall be transferred including accumulated annual leave, sick leave, compensatory time, and service credit for each affected employee. No employee shall suffer any penalty in the transfer.

On May 1, 2017, all contract employees of Eastern Kentucky University who are engaged in providing instructional and support services to the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall be transferred to the personnel system under KRS Chapter 18A. All records shall be transferred, including accumulated annual leave, sick leave, compensatory time, and service credit for each affected employee. The personnel officers who administer the personnel systems for Eastern Kentucky University and under KRS Chapter 18A shall exercise the necessary administrative procedures to effect the change in personnel authority. No employee shall suffer any penalty in the transfer.

History.

Repealed, reenacted and amended by 1982, ch. 448, § 23, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 253, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 350, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 494, § 18, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 159, § 1, effective March 30, 1990; 1990, ch. 496, § 25, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 100, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 31, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 353, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 540, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 203, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 526, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 137, § 4, effective June 21, 2001; 2004, ch. 127, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2004, ch. 191, § 51, effective April 22, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 43, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 105, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 25, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 153, § 10, effective April 13, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 5, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 58, § 3, effective March 21, 2017; 2018 ch. 114, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 12, § 4, effective March 12, 2021; 2021 ch. 26, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

18A.120.
Basis for hiring for classified service — Exception — Credit for sick leave.

Except as hereinafter provided, all hiring for the classified service shall be on the basis of competitive examinations and certification by the cabinet in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

.

As of February 29, 1976, when an entity and its employees, either initially or subsequently, is brought into the state service, all employees of that entity required to be covered under the classified service shall be required to meet the minimum qualifications for the positions to which they are assigned and to satisfactorily complete a probationary period, except that in the discretion of the secretary they shall not be required to take an examination. The secretary shall equitably assign such employees within the salary range of an appropriate pay grade. Upon the recommendation of the appointing authority, the secretary may authorize the credit of the amount of sick leave the employee had prior to being brought into state service. After completion of the initial probationary period employees employed under this statute shall be credited with the amount of service they had with this previous entity for accumulation of annual leave and other purposes of this chapter.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 24, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 247, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 154, § 31, effective July 15, 1998.

18A.125.
Control through payroll certification.

No disbursing or auditing officer of the Commonwealth shall make or approve or take any part in making or approving any payment for personal service to any person holding a position in the classified or unclassified service unless the payroll voucher or account of such pay bears the certification of the secretary, or of his authorized agent, that the persons named therein have been appointed and employed in accordance with the provisions of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

and the rules, regulations, and orders thereunder. The secretary may for proper cause or upon order of the board withhold certification from an entire payroll or from any specific item or items thereon. The secretary may, however, provide that certification of payrolls may be made once every six (6) months, and such certification shall remain in effect except in the case of any officer or employee whose status has changed after the last certification of his payroll. In the latter case no voucher for payment of salary to such employee shall be issued or payment of salary made without the further certification of the secretary.

Any citizen, including public officers, may maintain a suit to restrain a disbursing officer from making any payment in contravention of any provision of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

, or of any rule, regulation or order thereunder. Any sum paid contrary to any provision of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

or of any rule, regulation, or order thereunder may be recovered in an action maintained by any citizen, from any officer who made, approved, or authorized such payment or who signed or countersigned a voucher, payroll check or warrant for such payment, or from the sureties on the official bond of any such officer. All moneys recovered in any such action shall be paid into the Treasury.

Any person appointed or employed in contravention of any provision of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

or of any rule, regulation, or order thereunder, who performs service for which he is not paid, may maintain an action against the officer or officers, employee or employees, who purported so to appoint or employ him, to recover the agreed pay for such services, or the reasonable value thereof if no pay was agreed upon. No such officer or employee shall be reimbursed by the Commonwealth at any time for any sum paid to such person on account of such services.

If the secretary wrongfully withholds certification of the payroll voucher or account of any employee, such employee may maintain a proceeding in the Circuit Court in the county in which he resides to compel the secretary to certify such payroll voucher or account.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 25, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 154, § 32, effective July 15, 1998.